District of Columbia statutes.
1-325.81

FEMS Special Events Fee Fund.

(a)

There is established as a lapsing fund the FEMS Special Events Fee Fund (“Fund”) to be used for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section and into which shall be deposited all fees assessed and collected relating to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department service delivery under § 47-2826 to cover the costs of the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department in providing services for special events.

(b)

The Fund shall be used for expenses related to the Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department’s provision of services for special events, including:

(1)

Personnel costs;

(2)

Equipment;

(3)

Supplies;

(4)

Training;

(5)

Risk reduction; and

(6)

Repairs and maintenance of equipment and supplies.

(c)

All funds deposited into the Fund shall be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section. Any unexpended monies in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia.

History

Sept. 18, 2007, D.C. Law 17-20, § 3052, 54 DCR 7052
Sept. 14, 2011, D.C. Law 19-21, § 9103, 58 DCR 6226
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, § 98(f), 59 DCR 6190
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 3004, 61 DCR 9990

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 19-21, in subsec. (a), substituted “lapsing” for “nonlapsing”; and, in subsec. (c), substituted “be used exclusively for the purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section. Any unexpended monies in the Fund at the end of a fiscal year shall revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia” for “shall not revert to the unrestricted fund balance of the General Fund of the District of Columbia at the end of a fiscal year, or at any other time, but shall be continually available for the uses and purposes set forth in subsection (b) of this section without regard to fiscal year limitation, subject to authorization by Congress”.
The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-171 validated a previously made technical correction in (c).
The 2015 amendment by D.C. Law 20-155 added “relating to Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department service delivery” in (a).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) enactments, see §§ 3042, 3052 of Fiscal Year 2008 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-74, July 25, 2007, 54 DCR 7549).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 3004 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Short title: Section 3051 of D.C. Law 17-20 provided that subtitle F of title III of the act may be cited as the “FEMS Special Events Fee Fund Establishment Act of 2007”.